Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-144] Improper hazarding of vessel.
(a) Any person subject to this chapter who wilfully and wrongfully hazards or
suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of the United States or
of the state military forces shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

(b) Any person subject to this chapter who
negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded any vessel of the armed forces of
the United States or of the state military forces shall be punished as a
court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next